Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-909
Application for license; timely action of director required; appeal.

The director shall approve or deny an application for a license by written order not more than ninety days after the filing of a substantially complete application. Failure of the director to act on a substantially complete application within ninety days shall constitute approval of the application. An order of the director issued pursuant to this section may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 9.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.